South Dakota, session 2026, HB1265.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 41-11-7 be AMENDED:
41-11-7. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual may not take,
have in possession, or intentionally break or destroy any nest or the eggs of the kinds of
birds, the taking or killing of which is at any time or at all times prohibited. A violation of
this section is a Class 2 misdemeanor.
Nothing in this section prohibits any egg salvage activity if:
(1) The individual holds a migratory bird special purpose salvage permit, issued by the
United States Fish and Wildlife Service, in accordance with 50 C.F.R § 21.95
(January 1, 2026); and
(2) The salvage activity does not involve the eggs of birds, the taking or killing of which
is at all times prohibited.

26.741.30 2 1265
An Act to authorize the salvage of certain bird eggs.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1265
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1265 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1265 ENROLLED